Washington statutes.
RCW 10.55.120

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as "Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from Without a State in Criminal Proceedings."

[ 1943 c 218 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2150-6.]